Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2 Jurisdiction, Powers, and Duties Generally
46-2-26.5.
Gas supply plans and adjustment factors; filings and hearing procedures; recovery of purchase gas cost.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Adjustment factor” means a factor used pursuant to a purchased gas adjustment rate to recover purchased gas costs.

“Commission” means the Georgia Public Service Commission.

“Firm customer” means a customer who purchases gas from a gas utility on a firm basis which ordinarily is not subject to interruption or curtailment.

“Gas supply plan” means the particular array of available gas supply, storage, and transportation options selected by a gas utility to supply the requirements of its firm customers.

“Gas utility” means a gas utility subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

“Purchased gas adjustment rate” means a purchased gas adjustment rider or similar rate, provision, or clause in the tariff of a gas utility pursuant to which purchased gas costs are billed to the firm customers of the gas utility.

“Purchased gas costs” means all costs incurred by a gas utility for the purpose of acquiring gas delivered to its system in order to supply its firm customers, including without limitation the costs incurred in purchasing gas from sellers; the costs incurred in transactions involving rights to buy and sell gas; the costs incurred in gathering gas for transportation to the gas utility; the costs incurred in transporting gas to the facilities of the gas utility; the costs incurred in acquiring and using gas storage service from others, including the costs of injecting and withdrawing gas from storage; and all charges, fees, and rates incurred in connection with such purchases, rights, gathering, storage, and transportation.

“Recovery year” means the 12 calendar months commencing October 1, 1994, and ending September 30, 1995, and each succeeding 12 calendar month period thereafter.

Commencing October 1, 1994, the requirements of this Code section shall apply to any purchased gas adjustment rate. The requirements of Code Section 46-2-25 shall not apply to filings made or proceedings conducted pursuant to this Code section.

On or before August 1 of each year, each gas utility shall file with the commission its gas supply plan for the following recovery year. The gas utility shall include with such filing the adjustment factors it proposes for recovering its purchased gas costs during such following recovery year, together with the calculations that produced such factors.

Not less than ten days after any such filing by a gas utility, the commission shall conduct a public hearing on such filing. The gas utility’s testimony shall be under oath and shall, with any corrections thereto, constitute the gas utility’s affirmative case. At any hearing conducted pursuant to this Code section, the burden of proof to show that the proposed gas supply plan and adjustment factors are appropriate shall be upon the gas utility.

Following such a hearing, the commission shall issue an order approving the gas supply plan filed by the gas utility or adopting a gas supply plan for the gas utility that the commission deems appropriate. In addition, the commission in its order shall approve the adjustment factors proposed by the gas utility or adopt adjustment factors that the commission deems appropriate. The adjustment factors approved or adopted by the commission, or otherwise made effective under this Code section, shall be applied uniformly to all firm customers upon the effective date of such factors. The adjustment factors to be effective during the recovery year commencing October 1, 1994, shall be set at levels appropriate to account for underrecoveries or overrecoveries, if any, under the purchased gas adjustment rate of the gas utility in effect prior to October 1, 1994. The adjustment factors to be applicable during each recovery year commencing October 1, 1995, and thereafter, shall be set at levels appropriate to account for underrecoveries or overrecoveries during the preceding recovery year. Should the commission fail or refuse to issue an order by the ninetieth day after the gas utility’s filing which either approves the gas supply plan filed by the gas utility or adopts a different gas supply plan for the gas utility, the gas supply plan proposed by the gas utility shall thereupon be deemed approved by operation of law. Similarly, should the commission fail or refuse to issue an order by such date which either approves the adjustment factors proposed by the gas utility or adopts different adjustment factors for the gas utility, the adjustment factors proposed by the gas utility shall thereupon be deemed approved by operation of law.

The provisions of law relating to parties, intervention, and discovery in proceedings before the commission shall apply with respect to proceedings under this Code section.

Each gas utility shall file with the commission monthly its actual monthly purchased gas costs and accumulated purchased gas costs during the recovery year. The gas utility shall include in such filing information which demonstrates whether such purchased gas costs were incurred in accordance with a gas supply plan which had become effective in accordance with the provisions of this Code section.

Each gas utility shall also file with the commission monthly the most current data available showing the monthly and accumulated overrecoveries or underrecoveries of actual purchased gas costs resulting from application of its purchased gas adjustment rate.

At least every three calendar months, the gas utility shall file proposed revisions to the adjustment factors based on actual unrecovered purchased gas costs in order that the revenues to be recovered pursuant to such rate during the remainder of the current recovery year shall equal, as nearly as possible, the gas utility’s unrecovered purchased gas costs through the end of such recovery year. The revisions to the adjustment factors, if any, shall be made to the nearest 0.01¢ per therm. Unless the commission directs otherwise, such revised adjustment factors shall become effective on the first day of the first calendar month that begins at least 15 days after the date of such filing.

All commission orders issued pursuant to this Code section shall contain the commission’s findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which the commission’s action is based. Any such order shall be deemed a final order subject to judicial review under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The commission shall not prohibit or limit the operation of a purchased gas adjustment rate of a gas utility to the extent that the adjustment permits increases or decreases to adjust for increased or decreased purchased gas costs when such increased or decreased purchased gas costs shall have become effective under the procedures of a federal regulatory agency or under a contract approved by a federal regulatory agency. Any subsequent refunds received by a gas utility with respect to any such increased purchased gas costs which become effective under procedures of a federal regulatory agency, or otherwise, shall be treated by the gas utility in such manner as the commission may direct.

Any purchased gas costs which are incurred by a gas utility in accordance with a gas supply plan which was in effect pursuant to the provisions of this Code section at the time such costs were incurred may be recovered by the gas utility under its purchased gas adjustment rate and shall not be disallowed retroactively by the commission nor by any court which reviews the action of the commission in the absence of fraud or willful misconduct on the part of the gas utility; provided, however, that the commission may disallow and make appropriate adjustments for any purchased gas costs that were not incurred in accordance with such a gas supply plan if the same resulted in higher purchased gas costs and were the result of clearly imprudent conduct on the part of the gas utility. The provisions of this Code section shall not prohibit the commission from authorizing a gas utility to recover under a purchased gas adjustment rate costs or amounts in addition to purchased gas costs, nor shall the provisions of this Code section prohibit the commission from removing from purchased gas costs those costs incurred by a gas utility for the purpose of acquiring gas to supply customers who are not firm customers.

After a gas supply plan has become effective under the provisions of this Code section as a result of a proceeding before the commission, the commission shall retain jurisdiction of the proceeding for the balance of the recovery year for the purposes set forth in this subsection. Upon the application of the affected gas utility or upon its own initiative, the commission may, after affording due notice and opportunity for hearing to the affected gas utility and the intervenors in the proceeding, amend the gas supply plan of the affected gas utility for the remainder of the recovery year. The amended gas supply plan shall become effective upon the date of the commission’s order and shall not have retroactive effect.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-26.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 630, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 709, § 1/SB 209.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “ninetieth day” for “forty-fifth day” in the sixth sentence of subsection (e).

46-2-27.
Notation on bill of charges for fuel adjustment, meter reading and consumption, and where rates charged may be obtained.

Upon the face or back of each periodic and terminal billing for retail consumption of electric, gas, and water services, there shall appear a conspicuous notation of charges for fuel adjustment and a notation of the meter reading upon which the billing was computed, including the previous reading and consumption. Where a customer is on a voluntary “budget bill” or “levelized bill” agreement, the actual consumption for any period of time may be omitted until the annual anniversary account billing. The rates on which the bill was computed shall be made readily available to the customer upon demand; and a notation of where the rates can be obtained shall appear on the face of the bill.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-309.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 574, § 1.

46-2-28.
Procedure for issuance of stocks, bonds, notes, or other debt by companies under commission’s jurisdiction; exemptions.

Each of the companies over which the commission has jurisdiction shall be required to furnish the commission a list of any stocks and bonds the issuance of which is contemplated.

It shall be unlawful for any of such companies to issue stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidences of debt, payable more than 12 months after the date of issuance, except upon the approval of the commission, and then only when necessary and for such amount as may be reasonably required for the acquisition of property; the construction and equipment of power plants and carsheds; the completion, extension, or improvement of its facilities or properties; the improvement or maintenance of its service; the discharge or lawful refunding of its obligations; or other lawful corporate purposes falling within the spirit of this Code section.

The decision of the commission shall be final as to the validity of the issuance of stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidences of debt by companies under the jurisdiction of the commission.

Before issuing stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidence of debt, a company under the jurisdiction of the commission shall secure an order from the commission authorizing such issue, the amount thereof, and the purpose and use for which the issue is authorized. For the purpose of enabling it to determine whether such order should be issued, the commission shall make such inquiry or investigation, hold such hearings, and examine such witnesses, books, papers, documents, or contracts as it may deem advisable or necessary.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, a company under the jurisdiction of the commission may issue notes or other evidences of debt for proper and lawful corporate purposes, payable at periods of not more than 12 months from the date of issuance, without the consent of the commission, provided that no such notes or other evidences of debt shall, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, be refunded by any issue of stocks, bonds, or other evidences of debt running for more than 12 months without the consent of the commission.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, motor common carriers and motor contract carriers regulated under Chapter 7 of this title shall be exempt from the provisions of this Code section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section or any other provision of law, local exchange companies as defined in paragraph (10) of Code Section 46-5-162 under the commission’s jurisdiction shall be exempt from the provisions of this Code section if the stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidences of debt are issued as part of a debt transaction that is an interstate transaction, as evidenced by the following:

The local exchange company is a wholly owned subsidiary of a parent company headquartered or domiciled outside of this state;

The debt transaction is by and between the parent company, the primary obligor, and a national bank or other lending or financial institution licensed or authorized to enter into such debt transaction by any state or federal agency; and

The local exchange company is issuing stocks, bonds, notes, or other evidences of debt for the purpose of providing collateral or other security to the lending or financial institution in order to accommodate the debt transaction of a parent company or other entity.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 8; Civil Code 1910, § 2665; Code 1933, § 93-414; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1518, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 582, § 1/HB 116; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 46/HB 942.

The 2011 amendment,

effective May 12, 2011, added subsection (g).

The 2012 amendment,

effective May 1, 2012, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the introductory language of subsection (g).

46-2-29.
Requirement of confidentiality of information obtained by commission member or employee in a proceeding under Code Section 46-2-28.

No member or employee of the commission shall, except when legally called upon by a court of competent jurisdiction, disclose or impart to anyone any fact which was obtained in his official capacity from or through any proceeding filed with the commission under Code Section 46-2-28, provided that this Code section shall not apply to any fact or information which is obtained through public hearings or which is not confidential in nature.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 8; Civil Code 1910, § 2665; Code 1933, § 93-319.

46-2-30.
Power of commission to make rules and regulations generally.

The commission shall have full power and authority to make rules and regulations to effectuate and implement all laws conferring powers and duties upon the commission. Any rule or regulation adopted by the commission shall be transmitted to the chairman of the appropriate committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate for review by such committees and recommendations by such committees to the General Assembly for appropriate action.

History.

Code 1933, § 93-308.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 404, § 2.

Cross references.

Provisions of Administrative Procedure Act pertaining specifically to commission, §§

50-13-10

,

50-13-17

,

50-13-19

.

46-2-31.
Annual report by commission to Governor.

It shall be the duty of the commission to make annual reports of its activities to the Governor and to recommend from time to time such legislation as it may deem advisable.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 14; Code 1882, § 719n; Ga. L. 1889, p. 133, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2201; Civil Code 1910, § 2644; Code 1933, § 93-318.

46-2-32.
Payment of fines into state treasury; cumulative nature of remedies provided by this title.

All fines recovered under this title shall be paid into the general fund of the state treasury, to be used for such purposes as the General Assembly may provide. The remedies provided in this title shall be regarded as cumulative of all other remedies given by law against railroad companies, and this title shall not be construed as repealing any statute giving such remedies.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 11; Code 1882, § 719k; Civil Code 1895, § 2198; Civil Code 1910, § 2641; Code 1933, § 93-418.

46-2-33.
Costs incurred by commission charged to utility; invoicing; recovery.

The cost to the commission of providing reasonably necessary specialized testimony and assistance in conducting affiliate transactions audits prior to utility rate cases, in monitoring nuclear power costs, and in proceedings initiated by the utility, including, but not limited to, utility rate cases, fuel cost recovery cases, gas supply cases, and capacity supply cases, shall be charged to the affected utility. The amount of any such charges shall not exceed $200,000.00 per case per year, except for utility rate cases, generation construction monitoring, integrated resource planning cases, and generation certification cases, to the extent such amount is not also being recovered pursuant to an order issued under subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3A-5, which shall not exceed $600,000.00 per case per year. The maximum fee shall be adjusted on an annual basis based on the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. In the event the Consumer Price Index is no longer available, the commission shall select a comparable broad national measure of inflation. This Code section shall not apply to proceedings for Tier 1 local exchange companies that have elected alternative regulation or to certificated competing local exchange carriers.

At the time the commission determines that specialized testimony and assistance is required, the commission shall issue an order setting forth the scope and budget for such testimony and assistance. All invoices relating to the testimony and assistance shall be subject to commission review and approval, and no utility shall be required to pay any invoice not approved by the commission.

The amounts paid by regulated companies under this Code section shall be deemed a necessary cost of providing service, and the utility shall be entitled to recover the full amount of any costs charged to the utility pursuant to this Code section. In addition, at the election of the utility, the utility shall be entitled to recover all such costs promptly through a reasonably designed rider designated for such purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-2-33

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 111, § 1/HB 1233.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2010.